apertium-olo.olo.lexc
LEXICON PERS-PL3
! hyö:h
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:yö K ;
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:eijän K ;
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:eijät K ;
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<com%>:eijänke K ;
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<par%>:eidy K ;
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<abe%>:eittäh K ;
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:eil K ;
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:eilpäi K ;
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<ade%>:eil K ;
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<ade%>:eiläh K ;
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<all%>:eile K ;
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<ill%>:eih K ;
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<ine%>:eis K ;
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<ela%>:eis K ;
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<ela%>:eispäi K ;
%<prs%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:eillyö K ;


!  By default all pronouns get all number/case
!  this means that none will fail to generate
!  if the form happens to be wrong, it can be 
!  fixed by assigning the pronoun to the appropriate
!  continuation class. -FMT/TAP
LEXICON PRON_
%<prn%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<sg%>%<gen%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<sg%>%<com%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<sg%>%<par%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<sg%>%<all%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<sg%>%<abe%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<sg%>%<ade%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<sg%>%<abl%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<sg%>%<ill%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<sg%>%<ine%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<pl%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<pl%>%<gen%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<pl%>%<com%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<pl%>%<par%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<pl%>%<all%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<pl%>%<abe%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<pl%>%<ade%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<pl%>%<abl%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<pl%>%<ill%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<pl%>%<ine%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<pl%>: # ;



!! !DEMONSTRATIVE PRONOUNS
LEXICON PRON_SE
%<dem%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:e K ;
%<dem%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:en K ;
%<dem%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:il K ;
%<dem%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:ilpäi K ;
%<dem%>%<sg%>%<ade%>:il K ;
%<dem%>%<sg%>%<all%>:ille K ;
%<dem%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:ildy K ;
%<dem%>%<sg%>%<ill%>:ih K ;

LEXICON PRON_TÄMÄ !!= @CODE@ tämä:tä
%<dem%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:l K ;
%<dem%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:lpäi K ;
%<dem%>%<sg%>%<ade%>:l K ;
%<dem%>%<sg%>%<all%>:lle K ;
%<dem%>%<sg%>%<ess%>:nä K ;
%<dem%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:män K ;
%<dem%>%<sg%>%<ill%>:h K ;
%<dem%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:mä K ;
%<dem%>%<sg%>%<par%>:dä K ;
%<dem%>%<sg%>%<tra%>:kse K ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM_NÄMMÄ !!= @CODE@ nämmä:nämmä
!%<dem%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:l K ;
!%<dem%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:lpäi K ;
%<dem%>%<pl%>%<ade%>:%^RmVow%>il K ;
%<dem%>%<pl%>%<all%>:%^RmVow%>ile K ;
%<dem%>%<pl%>%<ess%>:%^RmVow%>inny K ;
%<dem%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:%^RmVow%>ien K ;
%<dem%>%<pl%>%<ill%>:%^RmVow%>ih K ;
%<dem%>%<pl%>%<ine%>:%^RmVow%>is K ;
%<dem%>%<pl%>%<nom%>: K ;
%<dem%>%<pl%>%<par%>:%^RmVow%>ii K ;
!%<dem%>%<pl%>%<tra%>:kse K ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM_NET !!= @CODE@ net:n
%<dem%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:et K ;
%<dem%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:iilöin K ;
%<dem%>%<pl%>%<com%>:iilöinke K ;
%<dem%>%<pl%>%<par%>:iilöi K ;
%<dem%>%<pl%>%<par%>:iidy K ;
%<dem%>%<pl%>%<abe%>:iilöittäh K ;
%<dem%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:iilöil K ;
%<dem%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:iilöilpäi K ;
%<dem%>%<pl%>%<ade%>:iilöil K ;
%<dem%>%<pl%>%<all%>:iilöile K ;
%<dem%>%<pl%>%<ela%>:iilöis K ;
%<dem%>%<pl%>%<ela%>:iilöispäi K ;
%<dem%>%<pl%>%<ess%>:iilöinny K ;
%<dem%>%<pl%>%<ine%>:iilöis K ;
%<dem%>%<pl%>%<ill%>:iilöih K ;
%<dem%>%<dep%>%<pl%>%<ade%>:iil K ;
%<dem%>%<dep%>%<pl%>%<all%>:iile K ;
%<dem%>%<dep%>%<pl%>%<ine%>:iis K ;
%<dem%>%<dep%>%<pl%>%<ill%>:iih K ;

!! !INDEFINITE
LEXICON PRON-INDEF_ !!= @CODE@ Still requires work
%<pri%>ef: K ;

LEXICON PRON-INDEF_KEN !!= @CODE@ kentahto:ke
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<abl%>:lpäi TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<ade%>:l TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<all%>:lle TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<com%>:nenke TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<ela%>:nespäi TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<gen%>:nen TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<ill%>:neh TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<ine%>:nes TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<nom%>:n TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<par%>:dä TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<tra%>:nekse TAHTO/LIENNE ;

LEXICON PRON-INDEF_KUDAI !!= @CODE@ kudaitahto:kuda
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<abl%>:%>malpäi TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<ade%>:%>mal TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<all%>:%>male TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<ela%>:%>maspäi TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>man TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<ill%>:%>mah TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<ine%>:%>mas TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<nom%>:i TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<par%>:idu TAHTO/LIENNE ;


LEXICON PRON-INDEF_MI !!= @CODE@ mitahto:mi
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<abl%>:%>lpäi TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<ade%>:%>l TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<ade%>:%>l»tah K ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<all%>:%>lle TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<all%>:%>lle»tah K ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>n TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<ill%>:%>h TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<ill%>:%>h»tah K ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<ine%>:%>s TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<nom%>: TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<par%>:%>dä TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<tra%>:%>kse TAHTO/LIENNE ;

LEXICON PRON-INDEF_MITTUINE !!= @CODE@ mittuinetahto:mittu
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<abl%>:%>malpäi TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<ade%>:%>mal TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<all%>:%>male TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<ela%>:%>maspäi TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<ess%>:%>mannu TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>man TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<ill%>:%>mah TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<ine%>:%>mas TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<nom%>:ine TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<par%>:%>mua TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<sg%>%<tra%>:%>makse TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<pl%>%<abl%>:%>milpäi TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<pl%>%<ade%>:%>mil TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<pl%>%<all%>:%>mile TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<pl%>%<ela%>:%>mispäi TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<pl%>%<ess%>:%>minnu TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<pl%>%<gen%>:%>mien TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<pl%>%<ill%>:%>mih TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<pl%>%<ine%>:%>mis TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>mat TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<pl%>%<par%>:%>mii TAHTO/LIENNE ;
%<pri%>ef%<pl%>%<tra%>:%>mikse TAHTO/LIENNE ;

LEXICON TAHTO/LIENNE
:»lienne K ;
:»tahto K ;
:»tah K ;

LEXICON PRON-INDEF_NIMI !!= @CODE@ nimi:ni«mi
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:t K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<ela%>:späi K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:n K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<ill%>:h K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<ine%>:s K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<par%>:dä K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<tra%>:kse K ;

LEXICON PRON-INDEF_NIKEN !!= @CODE@ niken:ni«ke
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:lpäi K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<ade%>:l K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<all%>:lle K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<com%>:nenke K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<ela%>:nespäi K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:nen K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<ill%>:neh K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<ine%>:nes K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:n K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<par%>:dä K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<tra%>:nekse K ;

LEXICON PRON-INDEF_NIMITTUINE !!= @CODE@ nimittuine:ni«mittu
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:%>malpäi K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<ade%>:%>mal K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<all%>:%>male K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<ela%>:%>maspäi K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<ess%>:%>mannu K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>man K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<ill%>:%>mah K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<ine%>:%>mas K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ine K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<sg%>%<par%>:%>mua K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:%>milpäi K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<pl%>%<ade%>:%>mil K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<pl%>%<all%>:%>mile K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<pl%>%<ela%>:%>mispäi K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<pl%>%<ess%>:%>minnu K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:%>mien K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<pl%>%<ill%>:%>mih K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<pl%>%<ine%>:%>mis K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>mat K ;
%<pri%>ef%<neg%>%<pl%>%<par%>:%>mii K ;


!! !INTERROGATIVE
LEXICON PRON-INTERR_ !!= @CODE@ Still requires work
%<itg%>: K ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR_MI !!= @CODE@ mi:mi
%<itg%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:t K ;
%<itg%>%<sg%>%<ela%>:späi K ;
%<itg%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:n K ;
%<itg%>%<sg%>%<ill%>:h K ;
%<itg%>%<sg%>%<ine%>:s K ;
%<itg%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: K ;
%<itg%>%<sg%>%<par%>:dä K ;
%<itg%>%<sg%>%<tra%>:kse K ;

LEXICON adverbs
niken%<prn%>:ni«ke PRON-INDEF_NIKEN  "kukaan" ;
LEXICON Exceptions
joga:joga PRON_  "joka, jokainen" ;
kudai:kuda PRON_  "kuka , mikä; joka; mikä - mikä" ;
muduas:muduande PRON_ "muuan, muudan" ;
muduan:muduande PRON_  "muuan, muudan" ;
tämä:tämä PRON_  "tämä" ;
äijäs:äijäs PRON_  "mones" ;
erähät:erähät PRON_  "eräät, muutamat" ;
eräs:eräs PRON_  "eräs, muuan, muudan; jokin, joku (muu), toinen; mokoma" ;
kentahto:ke PRON-INDEF_KEN "" ;
kudaitahto:kuda PRON-INDEF_KUDAI "" ;
kuda-ken:kuda-ken PRON_ "" ;
kuda-kui:kuda-kui PRON_ "" ;
kuda-midä:kuda-midä PRON_ "" ;
kuda-mis:kuda-mis PRON_ "" ;
kus:kus PRON_ "" ;
mitahto:mi PRON-INDEF_MI "" ;
mittuinetahto:mittu PRON-INDEF_MITTUINE "" ;
nimittuine:ni«mittu PRON-INDEF_NIMITTUINE "" ;
kunne:kunne PRON-INTERR_ "minne, mihin, kunne" ;
LEXICON pronouns
mollembat%<prn%>:mollembat PRON_  "" ;
minny%<prn%>:minny PRON_  "minä" ;
kai%<prn%>:kai PRON_  "kaikki" ;
net%<prn%>:n PRON-DEM_NET  "ne" ;
kunne%<prn%>:kunne PRON-INTERR_  "minne" ;
eulo% kunne%<prn%>:eulo% kunne PRON_  "ei mihinkään" ;
eulo% kus%<prn%>:eulo% kus PRON_  "ei missään" ;
ga%<prn%>:ga PRON_  "niin" ;
gu%<prn%>:gu PRON_  "kuka" ;
hyö%<prn%>:h PERS-PL3  "he" ;
jälles%<prn%>:jälles PRON_  "jällestä" ;
jongoi%<prn%>:jongoi PRON_  "jo" ;
ken-ollou%<prn%>:ken-ollou PRON_  "joku" ;
ken-tahto%<prn%>:ken-tahto PRON_  "joku" ;
kenen%<prn%>:kenen PRON_  "kenen" ;
keral%<prn%>:keral PRON_  "mukana" ;
keralle%<prn%>:keralle PRON_  "mukaan" ;
kunne-ollou%<prn%>:kunne-ollou PRON_  "jonnekin" ;
kunne-tahto%<prn%>:kunne-tahto PRON_  "jonnekin" ;
kunnepäi%<prn%>:kunnepäi PRON_  "minne" ;
kunne%<prn%>:kunne PRON_  "minne" ;
meile%<prn%>:meile PRON_  "" ;
mi%<prn%>:mi PRON-INTERR_MI  "mikä" ;
midä%<prn%>:midä PRON_  "mitä" ;
midä-tahto%<prn%>:midä-tahto PRON_  "mitä tahansa" ;
migäli%<prn%>:migäli PRON_  "jos" ;
mikse%<prn%>:mikse PRON_  "miksi" ;
mil%<prn%>:mil PRON_  "" ;
milleh%<prn%>:milleh PRON_  "miten" ;
mindäh%<prn%>:mindäh PRON_  "miksi" ;
mistöi%<prn%>:mistöi PRON_  "mistä" ;
molembat%<prn%>:molembat PRON_  "molemmat" ;
mollei%<prn%>:mollei PRON_  "molemmat" ;
muga%<prn%>:muga PRON_  "niin" ;
nenne%<prn%>:nenne PRON_  "ne" ;
net%<prn%>:n PRON-DEM_NET  "ne" ;
netai%<prn%>:netai PRON_  "tuo" ;
netualleh%<prn%>:netualleh PRON_  "noin" ;
netuane%<prn%>:netuane PRON_  "tuonne" ;
netuas%<prn%>:netuas PRON_  "tuossa" ;
netäs%<prn%>:netäs PRON_  "tässä" ;
neče%<prn%>:neče PRON_  "tämä" ;
nečie%<prn%>:nečie PRON_  "siellä" ;
nečilleh%<prn%>:nečilleh PRON_  "noin" ;
nečine%<prn%>:nečine PRON_  "tuonne" ;
nečis%<prn%>:nečis PRON_  "tuolla" ;
ni% mi%<prn%>:ni% mi PRON_  "ei mikään" ;
ni% mistöi%<prn%>:ni% mistöi PRON_  "" ;
nikudai%<prn%>:nikudai PRON_  "" ;
nikus%<prn%>:nikus PRON_  "" ;
nikuspäi%<prn%>:nikuspäi PRON_  "" ;
nimidä%<prn%>:nimi PRON-INDEF_NIMI  "" ;
nämmä%<prn%>:nämmä PRON-DEM_NÄMMÄ  "nämä" ;
nämmä%<prn%>:nämä PRON-DEM_NÄMMÄ  "nämä" ;
peräs%<prn%>:peräs PRON_  "" ;
piäl%<prn%>:piäl PRON_  "" ;
samanmoine%<prn%>:samanmoine PRON_  "" ;
se%<prn%>:s PRON_SE  "se" ;
sego%<prn%>:sego PRON_  "sekä" ;
semmoine%<prn%>:semmoine PRON_  "sellainen" ;
sendäh%<prn%>:sendäh PRON_  "" ;
senäi%<prn%>:senäi PRON_  "" ;
sežo%<prn%>:sežo PRON_  "" ;
sid%<prn%>:sid PRON_  "" ;
sidä%<prn%>:sidä PRON_  "" ;
sigäli%<prn%>:sigäli PRON_  "" ;
sih%<prn%>:sih PRON_  "" ;
sillo%<prn%>:sillo PRON_  "" ;
sinne%<prn%>:sinne PRON_  "" ;
sinnembä%<prn%>:sinnembä PRON_  "" ;
sinnembäine%<prn%>:sinnembäine PRON_  "" ;
sinäpäin%<prn%>:sinäpäin PRON_  "" ;
tagah%<prn%>:tagah PRON_  "" ;
taganpäi%<prn%>:taganpäi PRON_  "" ;
tagači%<prn%>:tagači PRON_  "" ;
toiči%<prn%>:toiči PRON_  "" ;
tuakse%<prn%>:tuakse PRON_  "taakse" ;
tuo%<prn%>:tuo PRON_  "" ;
tyveh%<prn%>:tyveh PRON_  "" ;
tämä%<prn%>:tä PRON_TÄMÄ  "tämä" ;
tämänmoine%<prn%>:tämänmoine PRON_  "" ;
tänne%<prn%>:tänne PRON_  "" ;
tännepäi%<prn%>:tännepäi PRON_  "" ;
uaže%<prn%>:uaže PRON_  "" ;
vaiku%<prn%>:vaiku PRON_  "" ;
valdua%<prn%>:valdua PRON_  "" ;
vaste-vai%<prn%>:vaste-vai PRON_  "" ;
viereh%<prn%>:viereh PRON_  "" ;
vieres%<prn%>:vieres PRON_  "" ;
vikse%<prn%>:vikse PRON_  "" ;
vot%<prn%>:vot PRON_  "" ;
vuoh%<prn%>:vuoh PRON_  "" ;
vähilleh%<adv%>:vähilleh PRON_  "" ;
ynnä%<prn%>:ynnä PRON_  "" ;
